apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="फी__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कई/अ__adj">
      <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->      
                
   
	
 
	 <pardef n="बोल__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

	<e lm="चाह"><i>चाह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भर"><i>भर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खोज"><i>खोज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खेल"><i>खेल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढूॅंड"><i>ढूॅंड</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन"><i>सुन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="जान"><i>जान</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="सोच"><i>सोच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="गिन"><i>गिन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="भेज"><i>भेज</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="चुक"><i>चुक</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="मिल"><i>मिल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="पूछ"><i>पूछ</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बन"><i>बन</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="लिख"><i>लिख</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बोल"><i>बोल</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पहुँच"><i>पहुँच</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कह"><i>कह</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कर"><i>कर</i><par n="बोल__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रतियोगी"><i>अप्रतियोगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपसंहारी"><i>उपसंहारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वातिशायी"><i>सर्वातिशायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुनाली"><i>दुनाली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मगही"><i>मगही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आगामी"><i>आगामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फानी"><i>बर्फानी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अरेणुअ"><i>अरेणु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उतनी"><i>उतनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="परोपजीवी"><i>परोपजीवी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐबी"><i>ऐबी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संक्रामी"><i>संक्रामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अयोनिअ"><i>अयोनि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बैंगनी"><i>बैंगनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सगुणी"><i>सगुणी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दीर्घजीवी"><i>दीर्घजीवी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुहारिअ"><i>अनुहारि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मध्यवर्ती"><i>मध्यवर्ती</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अग्रणी"><i>अग्रणी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँअ"><i>फलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="द्रोही"><i>द्रोही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेकाकी"><i>अनेकाकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुसंधायी"><i>अनुसंधायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुत्रिणी"><i>पुत्रिणी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शान्तिकारी"><i>शान्तिकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="इराकी"><i>इराकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुनरावर्ती"><i>पुनरावर्ती</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्षपाती"><i>पक्षपाती</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलमुहाँअ"><i>कलमुहाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आग्रही"><i>आग्रही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चंद्रवंशी"><i>चंद्रवंशी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फसली"><i>फसली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अकामी"><i>अकामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दंगली"><i>दंगली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संप्रदायवादी"><i>संप्रदायवादी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्वगामी"><i>पूर्वगामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मायावी"><i>मायावी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हैवानी"><i>हैवानी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ऊर्ध्वगामी"><i>ऊर्ध्वगामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कंकालमाली"><i>कंकालमाली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमूर्तिअ"><i>अमूर्ति</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शुभंकरी"><i>शुभंकरी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अणुवादी"><i>अणुवादी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुलाबी"><i>गुलाबी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="इकासी"><i>इकासी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लोभविजयी"><i>लोभविजयी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मृदंगी"><i>मृदंगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अद्वेषी"><i>अद्वेषी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषाई"><i>भाषाई</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घमंडी"><i>घमंडी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="परितापी"><i>परितापी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फ्री"><i>फ्री</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्त्री"><i>अस्त्री</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुत्तरदायी"><i>अनुत्तरदायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शतवार्षिकी"><i>शतवार्षिकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अहिंदी"><i>अहिंदी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वोपकारी"><i>सर्वोपकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुभावी"><i>अनुभावी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमोघदृष्टिअ"><i>अमोघदृष्टि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पल्लवग्राही"><i>पल्लवग्राही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बालिका"><i>बालिका</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तिलिस्मी"><i>तिलिस्मी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलंकी"><i>कलंकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अपतिअ"><i>अपति</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लुढकनी"><i>लुढकनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनपकारी"><i>अनपकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐतरेयी"><i>ऐतरेयी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सवाई"><i>सवाई</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पायुअ"><i>अल्पायु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पबुद्धिअ"><i>अल्पबुद्धि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पवादी"><i>अल्पवादी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निरुपयोगी"><i>निरुपयोगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्पर्शी"><i>संस्पर्शी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अभिगामी"><i>अभिगामी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पसंतोषी"><i>अल्पसंतोषी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कईअ"><i>कई</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अव्यवसायी"><i>अव्यवसायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुश्तैनी"><i>पुश्तैनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शाली"><i>शाली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मयोनिअ"><i>ब्रह्मयोनि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हिनाई"><i>हिनाई</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमृत्युअ"><i>अमृत्यु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलही"><i>कलही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्पताली"><i>अस्पताली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शीर्षघाती"><i>शीर्षघाती</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गूढकारी"><i>गूढकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मेधाविनी"><i>मेधाविनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिवर्ती"><i>प्रतिवर्ती</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कोखजली"><i>कोखजली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वनवासी"><i>वनवासी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अलगाऊअ"><i>अलगाऊ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँफलाँअ"><i>फलाँफलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्जुनच्छविअ"><i>अर्जुनच्छवि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मंगलकारी"><i>मंगलकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रभुअ"><i>अप्रभु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्तुअ"><i>अवस्तु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अत्यागी"><i>अत्यागी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाजरूअ"><i>बाजरू</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नियतिवादी"><i>नियतिवादी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भूशायी"><i>भूशायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
